District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.18

Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology.

(a)

There is established a Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology, which shall consist of 7 members appointed by the Mayor.

(b)

The Board shall regulate the practice of audiology, the practice of speech pathology, the practice of audiology and speech-language pathology assistants, and the practice of speech-language pathology clinical fellows.

(c)

The Board shall administer the examination required for audiology and speech-language pathology licenses.

(d)

Of the members of the Board, 2 shall be practicing audiologists, 3 shall be practicing speech-language pathologists, and 2 shall be consumer members with no direct affiliation with either the practice of audiology or the practice of speech-language pathology or other health profession. The professional members shall:

(1)

For audiology, at least 3 years preceding appointment, have been actively engaged as an audiologist in rendering professional services in audiology or in the education and training of masters, doctoral, or postdoctoral students of audiology in audiology research, and for the 2 years preceding the appointment, have spent the majority of their time devoted to one of the activities listed in this paragraph.

(2)

For speech pathology, at least 3 years preceding the appointment, have been actively engaged as a speech-pathologist in rendering professional services in speech pathology or in the education and training of masters, doctoral, or postdoctoral students of speech pathology in speech-pathology research, and for the 2 years preceding the appointment, have spent the majority of their time devoted to one of the activities listed in this paragraph.

(3)

For otolaryngology, at least 3 years preceding the appointment, have been actively engaged as an otolaryngologist in rendering professional services in otolaryngology or in the education and training of masters, doctoral, or postdoctoral students of otolaryngology in otolaryngology research, and for the 2 years preceding the appointment have spent the majority of their time devoted to one of the activities listed in this paragraph.

(e)

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 4 years. No person may be appointed more than once to fill an unexpired term or more than 2 consecutive full terms.

(f)

The initial appointees, with the exception of the representatives of the general public and the Otolaryngologist, shall be deemed to be and shall become licensed audiologists and speech-language pathologists immediately upon their qualification and appointment as members of the Board.

(g)

Of the members initially appointed, 2 shall be appointed for 2 years, 2 shall be appointed for 3 years, and 3 members, including the chairperson, shall be appointed for 4 years.

(h)

The Mayor shall designate one Board member to serve as chairperson during the term of his or her appointment to the Board. No person may serve as chairperson for more than 4 years.

History

Mar, 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 218
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-219, § 2(d), 53 DCR 10211
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(h), 61 DCR 1184

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 rewrote (b) and the introductory language of (d).